Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 29 Libel and Slander

Cross references. —

As to limitation of action for libel and slander, see §

1-3-105

.

As to abatement of cause of action by death of either party, see §

1-4-102

.

For provision that truth is defense to civil or criminal action for libel, see art. 1, § 20, Wyo. Const.

Instruction on right of jury to refuse law held proper. —

Under constitutional provision that jury shall have right to determine the facts and the law in libel cases under direction of the court, instruction as to rights of jury in refusing the law as given in the instructions and in finding contrary thereto was proper. Nicholson v. State, 24 Wyo. 347, 157 P. 1013,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1916).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

50 Am. Jur. 2d Libel and Slander §§ 313 to 341.

Privileged nature of statements or utterances by member of school board in course of official proceedings, 85 ALR3d 1137.

Privileged nature of communication between insurer and insured, 85 ALR3d 1161.

Defamation: Loss of employer's qualified privilege to publish employee's work record or qualification, 24 ALR4th 144.

State constitutional protection of allegedly defamatory statements regarding private individual, 33 ALR4th 212.

Criticism or disparagement of physician's or dentist's character, competence or conduct as defamation, 38 ALR4th 836.

Defamation of psychiatrist, psychologist or counselor, 38 ALR4th 874.

What constitutes “single publication” within meaning of single publication rule affecting action for libel and slander, violation of privacy or similar torts, 41 ALR4th 541.

Actionable nature of advertising impugning quality or worth of merchandise or products, 42 ALR4th 318.

Criticism or disparagement of attorney's character, competence or conduct as defamation, 46 ALR4th 326.

Defamation by gestures or acts, 46 ALR4th 403.

Defamation: publication by intracorporate communication of employee's evaluation, 47 ALR4th 674.

Defamation: privilege attaching to news report of criminal activities based on information supplied by public safety officers — modern status, 47 ALR4th 718.

Physician's tort liability for unauthorized disclosure of confidential information about patient, 48 ALR4th 668.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of compensatory damages for defamation, 49 ALR4th 1158.

Liability of better business bureau or similar organization in tort, 50 ALR4th 745.

Defamation: who is “libel-proof,” 50 ALR4th 1257.

Name appropriation by employer or former employer, 52 ALR4th 156.

Libel and slander: defamation by cartoon, 52 ALR4th 424.

Libel and slander: defamation by photograph, 52 ALR4th 488.

Defamation of class or group as actionable by individual member, 52 ALR4th 618.

Liability of employer, supervisor or manager for intentionally or recklessly causing employee emotional distress, 52 ALR4th 853.

Credit card issuer's liability, under state laws, for wrongful billing, cancellation, dishonor or disclosure, 53 ALR4th 231.

Libel and slander: defamation by question, 53 ALR4th 450.

Libel and slander: sufficiency of identification of allegedly defamed party, 54 ALR4th 746.

Defamation of professional athlete or sports figure, 54 ALR4th 869.

False light invasion of privacy — cognizability and elements, 57 ALR4th 22.

False light invasion of privacy — defenses and remedies, 57 ALR4th 244.

Imputation of criminal, abnormal, or otherwise offensive sexual attitude or behavior as defamation — post-New York Times cases, 57 ALR4th 404.

Libel or slander: defamation by statement made in jest, 57 ALR4th 520.

False light invasion of privacy — accusation or innuendo as to criminal acts, 58 ALR4th 902.

False light invasion of privacy — neutral or laudatory depiction of subject, 59 ALR4th 502.

False light invasion of privacy — disparaging but noncriminal depiction, 60 ALR4th 51.

Imputation of allegedly objectionable political or social beliefs or principles as defamation, 62 ALR4th 314.

Publication of allegedly defamatory matter by plaintiff (“self-publication”) as sufficient to support defamation action, 62 ALR4th 616.

Defamation: designation as “scab,” 65 ALR4th 1000.

Validity of criminal defamation statutes, 68 ALR4th 1014.

Intrusion by news-gathering entity as invasion of right of privacy, 69 ALR4th 1059.

In personam jurisdiction, in libel and slander action, over nonresident who mailed allegedly defamatory letter from outside state, 83 ALR4th 1006.

Who is “public figure” for purposes of defamation action, 19 ALR5th 1.

Who is “public official” for purposes of defamation action, 44 ALR5th 193.

Libel and slander: charging one with breach or nonperformance of contract, 45 ALR5th 739.

Defamation: publication of letter to editor in newspaper as actionable, 54 ALR5th 443.

Action under 42 USC § 1985(1) for conspiracy to defame or otherwise harm the reputation of federal official, 69 ALR Fed 913.

Free exercise of religion clause of first amendment as defense to tort liability, 93 ALR Fed 754.

53 C.J.S. Libel and Slander §§ 1 to 106, 187 to 197.

§ 1-29-101.
Radio and television stations; liability generally.

The owner, licensee or
operator of a visual or sound broadcasting station or network of stations,
and the agents or employees of the owner, licensee or operator are
not liable for damages for any defamatory statement published or uttered
in a visual or sound broadcast by one other than the owner, licensee,
or operator, or agent or employee thereof, unless the complaining
party proves that the owner, licensee, operator, agent or employee
failed to exercise due care to prevent the publication or utterance
of such statement in the broadcast.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 37, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-872; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-30-101

.

New York Times v. Sullivan not applicable. —

This section defines the standard of liability imposed upon visual or sound radio broadcasters where the standard of liability described in New York Times Co. v. Sullivan, 376 U.S. 254, 11 L. Ed. 2d 686, 84 S. Ct. 710, 1964 U.S. LEXIS 1655, 95 A.L.R.2d 1412 (1964), relating to public officials, is not applicable. Adams v. Frontier Broadcasting Co., 555 P.2d 556,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1976).

The states are free to adopt their own standards

of liability in connection with the rights of those who are neither public officials nor public figures. Adams v. Frontier Broadcasting Co., 555 P.2d 556,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1976).

Law reviews. —

See “Reading from Radio Script as Libel,” 2 Wyo. L.J. 127.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Libel or slander in television transmission, 15 ALR2d 785, 50 ALR3d 1311, 56 ALR3d 386.

False news reports as to births, betrothals, marriages, divorces or similar marital matters, 9 ALR3d 559.

Defamation by radio or television, 50 ALR3d 1311.

Libel and slander: necessity of expert testimony to establish negligence of media defendant in defamation action by private individual, 37 ALR4th 987.

Defamation: application of New York Times and related standards to nonmedia defendants, 38 ALR4th 1114.

Liability of internet service provider for internet or e-mail defamation, 84 ALR5th 169.

§ 1-29-102.
Radio and television stations; liability for statements made by political
candidates.

An owner, licensee or
operator or the agents or employees of any owner, licensee or operator
of a visual or sound broadcasting station is not liable for any damages
for any defamatory statement uttered over the facilities of the station
by any candidate for public office.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 37, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 1-873; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-30-102

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criticism or disparagement of character, competence or conduct of candidate for office as defamation, 37 ALR4th 1088.

§ 1-29-103.
Limitation as to damages.

In an action for damages
for any defamatory statement published or uttered in or as a part
of a visual or sound broadcast, the complaining party shall be allowed
only the actual damages he has alleged and proved.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 37, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 1-874; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-30-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is protected by statute restricting recovery unless retraction is demanded, 84 ALR3d 1249.

What constitutes special damages in action for slander of title, 4 ALR4th 532.

Proof of injury to reputation as prerequisite to recovery of damages in defamation action — post-Gertz cases, 36 ALR4th 807.

Defamation of church member by church or church official, 109 ALR5th 541.

§ 1-29-104.
Publication of proceedings of governing bodies deemed privileged;
exception.

The publication of a
fair and impartial report of the proceedings before state or municipal
legislative bodies, or before state or municipal executive bodies,
boards or officers, or the whole or a fair synopsis of any document
presented, filed or issued in any proceeding before a legislative
or executive body, board or officer, is privileged unless it is proved
that the publication was made maliciously.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 128, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-875; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-30-104

.

Cross references. —

As to privilege of members of the legislature, see art. 3, § 16, Wyo. Const.

Law reviews. —

See “Evidence of a Refusal to Retract in Actions of Libel,” 11 Wyo. L.J. 95.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Testimony of witness before legislative committee as basis for civil action for slander, 54 ALR2d 1298.

Libel and slander: privileged nature of statements or utterances by members of governing body of public institution of higher learning in course of official proceedings, 33 ALR4th 632.

Defamation: privilege accorded state or local governmental administrative records relating to private individual member of public, 40 ALR4th 318.

Who is “public official” for purposes of defamation action, 44 ALR5th 193.

Liability of newspaper for libel and slander - 21st century cases. 22 A.L.R.6th 553.

§ 1-29-105.
Publication of criminal and civil proceedings deemed privileged;
exceptions.

The publication of a
fair and impartial report of any indictment, the issuing of any warrant,
the arrest of any person accused of crime, or the filing of any pleading
or other document in any criminal or civil cause in any court, or
of the contents thereof, is privileged unless it is proved that the
same was published maliciously or that the defendant has refused or
neglected to publish in the same manner in which the publication complained
of appeared a reasonable written explanation or contradiction thereof
by the plaintiff, or that the publisher has refused upon plaintiff’s
request to publish the subsequent determination of the suit or action.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 128, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 1-876; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-30-105

.

Requirements for privilege to apply. —

The ordinary and obvious meaning of fair does not require that the report be true or accurate; what is required for the privilege to apply is that the report have qualities of impartiality and honesty, and be free from prejudice, favoritism and self-interest. Casteel v. News-Record, 875 P.2d 21,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1994).

“With malice” means

the statement was made with knowledge that it was false or with reckless disregard of whether it was false or not. Casteel v. News-Record, 875 P.2d 21,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1994).

Finding of malice defeats privilege. —

A finding of malice will defeat the privilege. When applying a conditional privilege, absence of malice is presumed, and the plaintiff must prove malice on the part of the defendant. Casteel v. News-Record, 875 P.2d 21,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Davis v. Big Horn Basin Newspapers, Inc., 884 P.2d 979,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Findings, reports or the like of judges as privileged, 42 ALR2d 825.

Privilege applicable to judicial proceedings as extending to administrative proceedings, 45 ALR2d 1296.

Proceedings, presentments, investigations and reports of grand jury, 48 ALR2d 716.

Statements in counsel's argument to jury as privileged, 61 ALR2d 1300.

Privilege in connection with proceedings to disbar attorney, 77 ALR2d 493.

Privilege of reporting judicial proceedings as extending to proceeding held in secret or as to which record is sealed by court, 43 ALR3d 634.

Propriety of publishing identity of sexual assault victim, 86 ALR3d 80.

Actionability of false newspaper report that plaintiff has been arrested, 93 ALR3d 625.

Libel and slander: reports of pleadings as within privilege for reports of judicial proceedings, 20 ALR4th 576.

Libel and slander: Attorneys' statements, to parties other than alleged defamed party or its agents, in course of extrajudicial investigation or preparation relating to pending or anticipated civil litigation as privileged, 23 ALR4th 932.

Who is “public official” for purposes of defamation action, 44 ALR5th 193.

Liability of newspaper for libel and slander - 21st century cases. 22 A.L.R.6th 553.

§ 1-29-106.
Publication of indecent matter prohibited.

Nothing in W.S.

1-29-104

or

1-29-105

shall authorize the publication of blasphemous or indecent
matter.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-30-106

.

Cross references. —

As to obscenity, see §§

6-4-301

and

6-4-302

.

There is no right of private
action based on §§

1-29-106

,

6-4-301

and

6-4-302

.

Dworkin v. Hustler Magazine, Inc., 634 F. Supp. 727, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 26567 (D. Wyo. 1986).

Am Jur 2d and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of newspaper for libel and slander - 21st century cases. 22 A.L.R.6th 553.